Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2670.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1507. Coordinated School Closure Board for Inclement Weather.--(a) Each school district that provides school transportation to students of nonpublic schools shall establish a school closure board for inclement weather no later than August 1, 2026.(b) The board shall be composed of the following members:(1) The school district superintendent or a designee, who shall serve as chairperson.(2) The school district's director or coordinator of 123456789101112131415161718192021 transportation.(3) A member of the school district's buildings and grounds department, to be appointed by the school district superintendent.(4) The chief administrator from each nonpublic school located within the school district boundaries that receives transportation services from the school district.(c) All members shall serve for as long as they hold their respective positions.(d) (1) A majority of members shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of any business.(2) Meetings may be conducted virtually.(e) Members shall receive no compensation for their services on the board.(f) An appointing authority shall appoint members to the board within thirty (30) days of establishment of the board. If a vacancy occurs on the board, the appointing authority shall appoint a successor member within thirty (30) days of the vacancy.(g) (1) The board shall meet no later than September 15 of each school year to:(i) Review and update emergency contact information for all board members.(ii) Maintain a list of all nonpublic schools receiving transportation services and their emergency contacts, to be updated annually.(iii) Establish or review decision-making protocols for school closures and delays due to inclement weather.(iv) Establish criteria for closure and transportation decisions based on road conditions, temperature, wind chill, 20260HB2670PN3705 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 snowfall amounts and weather forecasts after communication with local emergency management officials, first responders and local roadmasters.(v) Determine communication methods and timelines for notifying all parties, including employes, parents and students, of closure decisions.(2) During inclement weather events, the board shall:(i) Make the final determination regarding school closures or delays and transportation.(ii) Communicate the decision to all affected parties, including employes, parents and students, no later than 5:30 a.m. on the affected day, or as soon as practicable in emergency situations.(h) (1) The board's decision regarding transportation services during inclement weather shall be final and binding for transportation purposes. If the board determines that transportation will not be provided, transportation services shall not be provided to nonpublic school pupils, regardless of whether the nonpublic school remains in session.(2) Nothing in this section shall limit the authority of nonpublic schools to make independent decisions regarding whether to hold classes during inclement weather.(3) The school district shall not be liable for any decision made by a nonpublic school to remain in session when school district transportation services are canceled.(4) If the school district's schools are closed but weather and road conditions permit safe transportation, the school district shall provide transportation to nonpublic schools that remain in session according to their official school calendar.(i) As used in this section, the following words and phrases 20260HB2670PN3705 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Inclement weather" shall mean weather conditions, including snow, ice, extreme cold, flooding or other conditions, that may impact the safe operation of school transportation."Nonpublic school" shall mean as defined in section 923.3-A(b) and that receives transportation services for the nonpublic schools' pupils from a school district.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20260HB2670PN3705 - 4 - 123456789